Nebraska, session 109, LB1166.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1166 LB1166
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-958, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
79-958 (1)(a) Beginning on September 1, 2012, and prior to July 1,
2025, for the purpose of providing the funds to pay for formula
annuities, every employee shall be required to deposit in the School
Retirement Fund nine and seventy-eight hundredths of one percent of
compensation.
(b) Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter, the employee
contribution rate shall be calculated as of July 1 and based on the
funded ratio of the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement
Fund in the most recent previous year as reported in the annual actuarial
valuation report for the retirement system prepared for the retirement
board pursuant to section 84-1503.
(c)(i) The employee contribution rate that is calculated as of July
1, 2025, shall apply beginning July 1, 2025, and prior to July 1, 2026.
(ii) The employee contribution rate that is calculated as of July 1,
2026, shall apply beginning July 1, 2026, and prior to September 1, 2027.
(iii) Beginning in 2027 and each year thereafter, the employee
contribution rate that is calculated as of July 1 of such year shall
apply beginning September 1 of such year and prior to September 1 of the
next year after such year.
(d) Beginning on July 1, 2025, for the purpose of providing the
funds to pay for formula annuities, every employee shall deposit the
following amounts into the School Retirement Fund:
(i) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the
School Retirement Fund is less than ninety-six percent, nine and three-
quarters of one percent of compensation;
(ii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the
School Retirement Fund is ninety-six percent or greater and less than
ninety-eight percent, eight and three-quarters of one percent of
compensation;
-2-

LB1166 LB1166
2026 2026
(iii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the
School Retirement Fund is ninety-eight percent or greater and less than
one hundred percent, eight percent of compensation; and
(iv) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the
School Retirement Fund is one hundred percent or greater, seven and one-
quarter of one percent of compensation.
(e) (c) Deposits under this subsection shall be transmitted at the
same time and in the same manner as required employer contributions.
(2) For the purpose of providing the funds to pay for formula
annuities, every employer shall be required to deposit in the School
Retirement Fund one hundred one percent of the required contributions of
the school employees of each employer. Such deposits shall be transmitted
to the retirement board at the same time and in the same manner as such
required employee contributions.
(3) The employer shall pick up the member contributions required by
this section for all compensation paid on or after January 1, 1986, and
the contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions
pursuant to section 414(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code in determining
federal tax treatment under the code and shall not be included as gross
income of the member until such time as they are distributed or made
available. The contributions, although designated as member
contributions, shall be paid by the employer in lieu of member
contributions. The employer shall pay these member contributions from the
same source of funds which is used in paying earnings to the member. The
employer shall pick up these contributions by a compensation deduction
through a reduction in the cash compensation of the member. Member
contributions picked up shall be treated for all purposes of the School
Employees Retirement Act in the same manner and to the same extent as
member contributions made prior to the date picked up.
(4) The employer shall pick up the member contributions made through
irrevocable payroll deduction authorizations pursuant to sections 79-921
-3-

LB1166 LB1166
2026 2026
and 79-933.03 to 79-933.06, and the contributions so picked up shall be
treated as employer contributions in the same manner as contributions
picked up under subsection (3) of this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-958, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-